Utah statutes.
63F-1-205.   Approval of acquisitions of information technology.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Title 63M, Chapter 1, Part 26, Government Procurement Private Proposal Program, in accordance with Subsection (2), the chief information officer shall approve the acquisition by an executive branch agency of:

(i)  information technology equipment;

(ii)  telecommunications equipment;

(iii)  software;

(iv)  services related to the items listed in Subsections (1)(a)(i) through (iii); and

(v)  data acquisition.

(b)  The chief information officer may negotiate the purchase, lease, or rental of private or public information technology or telecommunication services or facilities in accordance with this section.

(c)  Where practical, efficient, and economically beneficial, the chief information officer shall use existing private and public information technology or telecommunication resources.

(d)  Notwithstanding another provision of this section, an acquisition authorized by this section shall comply with rules made by the applicable rulemaking authority under Title 63G, Chapter 6a, Utah Procurement Code.

(2)  Before negotiating a purchase, lease, or rental under Subsection (1) for an amount that exceeds the value established by the chief information officer by rule in accordance with Section 63F-1-206, the chief information officer shall:

(a)  conduct an analysis of the needs of executive branch agencies and subscribers of services and the ability of the proposed information technology or telecommunications services or supplies to meet those needs; and

(b)  for purchases, leases, or rentals not covered by an existing statewide contract, provide in writing to the chief procurement officer in the Division of Purchasing and General Services that:

(i)  the analysis required in Subsection (2)(a) was completed; and

(ii)  based on the analysis, the proposed purchase, lease, rental, or master contract of services, products, or supplies is practical, efficient, and economically beneficial to the state and the executive branch agency or subscriber of services.

(3)  In approving an acquisition described in Subsections (1) and (2), the chief information officer shall:

(a)  establish by administrative rule, in accordance with Section 63F-1-206, standards under which an agency must obtain approval from the chief information officer before acquiring the items listed in Subsections (1) and (2);

(b)  for those acquisitions requiring approval, determine whether the acquisition is in compliance with:

(i)  the executive branch strategic plan;

(ii)  the applicable agency information technology plan;

(iii)  the budget for the executive branch agency or department as adopted by the Legislature; and

(iv)  Title 63G, Chapter 6a, Utah Procurement Code; and

(c)  in accordance with Section 63F-1-207, require coordination of acquisitions between two or more executive branch agencies if it is in the best interests of the state.

(4) (a)  Each executive branch agency shall provide the chief information officer with complete access to all information technology records, documents, and reports:

(i)  at the request of the chief information officer; and

(ii)  related to the executive branch agency's acquisition of any item listed in Subsection (1).

(b)  Beginning July 1, 2006 and in accordance with administrative rules established by the department under Section 63F-1-206, no new technology projects may be initiated by an executive branch agency or the department unless the technology project is described in a formal project plan and the business case analysis has been approved by the chief information officer and agency head.  The project plan and business case analysis required by this Subsection (4) shall be in the form required by the chief information officer, and shall include:

(i)  a statement of work to be done and existing work to be modified or displaced;

(ii)  total cost of system development and conversion effort, including system analysis and programming costs, establishment of master files, testing, documentation, special equipment cost and all other costs, including overhead;

(iii)  savings or added operating costs that will result after conversion;

(iv)  other advantages or reasons that justify the work;

(v)  source of funding of the work, including ongoing costs;

(vi)  consistency with budget submissions and planning components of budgets; and

(vii)  whether the work is within the scope of projects or initiatives envisioned when the current fiscal year budget was approved.

(5) (a)  The chief information officer and the Division of Purchasing and General Services shall work cooperatively to establish procedures under which the chief information officer shall monitor and approve acquisitions as provided in this section.

(b)  The procedures established under this section shall include at least the written certification required by Subsection 63G-6a-303(5).



Amended by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session

